Massachusetts, session 194th, H4806.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8G of chapter 26 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
new paragraph:-
Section 8G. There shall be in the division of occupational licensure an auto damage
appraiser licensing board, hereinafter called the board, consisting of four persons to be appointed
by the governor, two of whom shall be affiliated with the auto body repair industry, and two of
whom shall be affiliated with insurance companies writing casualty insurance within the
commonwealth, and two persons to be appointed by the attorney general, one of whom shall be a
representative of their office, and one of whom shall be affiliated with an auto body repair shop
or an insurance company, and one person to be appointed by the commissioner of the division of
occupational licensure who shall not be affiliated with either the auto body industry or the
insurance industry and who shall be the chair of the board. Appointments shall be for a period of
three years, and no member shall be appointed for more than two consecutive terms. A vacancy
on the board shall be filled within 60 days from the date of the vacancy.
of 1